en: modified flour
bg: модифицирано брашно
cs: modifikovaná mouka
da: modificeret mel
de: modifiziertes Mehl
es: harina modificada
fi: muunnettu jauho
fr: farine modifiée
hr: modificirano brašno
hu: módosított liszt
it: farina modificata
nl: gemodificeerd meel
pl: mąka modyfikowana
pt: farinha modificada
ro: făină modificată
sk: modifikovaná múka
sv: modifierat mjöl

en: corn flour, maize flour, cornflour
bg: царевично брашно
ca: farina de blat de moro, farina de blat
cs: kukuřičná mouka
da: majsmel
de: Maismehl
el: αλεύρι καλαμποκιού
es: harina de maíz, harina maiz
et: maisijahu
fi: maissijauho, maissijauhoa
fr: farine de maïs, farine de mais
he: קמח תירס, קורנפלור
hr: kukuruzno brašno
hu: kukoricaliszt
is: maísmjöl
it: farina di mais
ja: コーンフラワー
lt: kukurūzų miltai
lv: kukurūzas milti
nb: maismel
nl: maïsmeel, maismeel
pl: mąka kukurydziana
pt: farinha de milho
ro: făină de porumb, faina de porumb
ru: Кукурузная мука
sk: kukuričná múka
sl: koruzna moka
sv: majsmjöl
uk: борошно кукурудзяне, кукурудзяне борошно
zh: 玉米淀粉

en: organic corn flour
de: Bio-Maismehl, Bio Maismehl
es: Harina de maíz orgánica
fi: luomu maissijauho
fr: farine de mais biologique
hr: organsko kukuruzno brašno
hu: bio kukoricaliszt
it: Farina di mais biologica
pt: farinha de milho orgânico

en: modified corn flour
bg: модифицирано царевично брашно
de: Modifiziertes Maismehl
fr: Farine de maïs modifié
hr: modificirano kukuruzno brašno
it: Farina di mais modificata
nl: gemodificeerd maïsmeel

en: yellow corn flour
da: gult majsmel
de: gelbes Maismehl
es: Harina de maíz amarillo
fi: keltainen maissijauho
fr: farine de maïs jaune
hr: žuto kukuruzno brašno
hu: sárga kukoricaliszt
it: farina di mais giallo
nb: gult maismel
nl: geel maïsmeel
sv: gult majsmjöl

en: white corn flour
da: hvidt majsmel
de: weisses Maismehl, weißes Maismehl
es: Harina de maíz blanco
fi: valkoinen maissijauho
fr: Farine de maïs blanc
hr: bijelo kukuruzno brašno
hu: fehér kukoricaliszt
it: farina di mais bianco, farina di mais bianco masa
nb: hvitt maismel
nl: wit maïsmeel, witte masa maïsmeel
sv: vitt majsmjöl

en: whole-grain blue corn flour
es: harina de maiz morado

en: whole grain corn flour, wholegrain corn flour, wholegrain maize flour, whole grain maize flour
bg: пълнозърнесто царевично брашно
de: Vollkornmaismehl
es: harina de maíz integral
fi: täysjyvämaissijauho
fr: farine de mais compléte
hr: kukuruzno brašno od cjelovitog zrna
it: farina di mais integrale
sv: fullkornsmajsmjöl

en: rice flour, riceflour
bg: Оризово брашно, брашно от ориз
ca: farina d'arròs
cs: rýžová mouka
da: rismel
de: Reismehl
el: αλεύρι ρυζιού
es: harina de arroz
et: riisijahu
fi: riisijauho
fr: farine de riz
he: קמח אורז
hr: rižino brašno
hu: rizsliszt
is: hrísmjöl
it: farina di riso
ja: 米粉
lt: ryžių miltai
lv: rīsu milti
nb: rismel
nl: rijstebloem, rijstbloem, rijstmeel, rijstemeel
pl: Mąka ryżowa, mąki ryżowa, mąki ryżowej
pt: farinha de arroz
ro: făină de orez
ru: Рисовая мука, мука-рисовая
sk: ryžová múka
sl: riževa moka
sr: пиринчано брашно
sv: rismjöl
th: แป้งข้าวก
tl: galapong
zh: 米粉

en: dextrinated rice flour
de: dextriniertes Reismehl
es: harina de arroz dextrinada
fr: farine de riz dextrinée
hr: dekstrinirano rižino brašno
hu: dextrinált rizsliszt
it: farina di riso destrinata
nl: gedextrineerd rijstmeel

en: pregelatinized rice flour
de: Reisquellmehl
fr: farine de riz prégélatinisée
hr: preželatinizirano rižino brašno
it: farina di riso pregelatinizzata

en: White rice flour
ca: farina de arròs blanc, farina d'arròs blanc
es: harina de arroz blanco
fr: farine de riz blanc
hr: bijelo rižino brašno
it: Farina di riso bianco

en: brown rice flour, full rice flour, whole rice flour, whole grain rice flour
bg: брашно от пълнозърнест ориз
da: fuldkornsrismel, brunt rismel
de: Reisvollkornmehl, braunes Reismehl, volles Reismehl, Vollkornreismehl, Reisvollmehl, braunes vollkorn reismehl
es: harina de arroz integral, harina integral de arroz
fi: tumma riisijauho, täysjyväriisijauho, ruskea riisijauho
fr: farine de riz complet, farine complète de riz, farine de riz complète, farine de riz brun
hr: integralno rižino brašno
hu: barnariszliszt
it: Farina di riso nero
nl: volkoren rijstmeel, brunt rismel
sv: brunt rismjöl

en: semi-wholemeal rice flour
fr: farine de riz semi-complète, farine de riz semi-complet, farine semi-complète de riz
hr: poluintegralno rižino brašno

en: quinoa flour
bg: брашно от киноа
de: Quinoa-Mehl, Quinoamehl
es: Harina de quinoa
fi: kvinoajauho
fr: farine de quinoa
hr: brašno od kvinoje
hu: quinoa liszt, quinoaliszt
it: Farina di quinoa
nl: quinoameel
pl: mąka z komosy ryżowej

en: whole grain quinoa flour
de: ​Quinoavollkornmehl, Quinoa-Vollkornmehl
hr: brašno od cijelog zrna kvinoje
it: farina di quinoa integrale

en: pea flour
bg: грахово брашно
ca: farina de pèsol, farina de pèsols
de: Erbsenmehl
es: harina de guisantes
fi: hernejauho
fr: farine de pois
hr: brašno graška
hu: borsóliszt
it: farina di piselli
nl: erwtenmeel
pl: mąka grochowa, mąka z grochu
ro: făină de mazăre

fr: Farine de pois cassés
en: Split pea flour
es: Harina de guisantes partidos
hr: brašno od graška
it: Farina di piselli spezzati
nl: Split erwtenmeel

en: whole green pea flour
de: ganzes grünes Erbsenmehl
hr: integralno brašno od zelenog graška
it: farina di piselli verdi integrali

en: coconut flour
bg: кокосово брашно
de: kokosmehl, kokosnussmehl
es: harina de coco
et: kookosjahu
fi: kookosjauho
fr: farine de noix de coco, farine de coco
hr: kokosovo brašno, kokos brašno
it: farina di cocco
pl: mąka kokosowa, mąka z kokosa
sv: kokosmjöl